Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ACADEMIC ACCELERATION PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Pilot program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner of education must establish a pilot program to increase access to advanced coursework in six school districts or charter schools during the 2026-2027 to 2028-2029 school years. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. new text end new text begin (b) "Advanced coursework" means an advanced placement course, postsecondary enrollment options course including a concurrent enrollment course, or honors course. new text end new text begin (c) "Participant" means a school district or charter school selected to participate in the pilot program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Automatic enrollment. new text end new text begin (a) A participant must adopt an automatic enrollment policy at one or more school sites that meets the minimum requirements of this subdivision. A participant may adopt additional eligibility criteria for students to participate in the academic acceleration policy so long as the criteria does not create inequities among student groups in the advanced coursework. new text end new text begin (b) The policy must require automatic enrollment in advanced coursework in language arts, mathematics, or science if the student meets eligibility criteria. A student is eligible for automatic enrollment if the student meets or exceeds the state standard on the applicable eighth grade or high school statewide assessment, or earns the highest grade available in a course in the applicable subject matter in the preceding school year. The subject matter of the advanced coursework in which a student is automatically enrolled depends on the content area or areas of assessment where the student has met or exceeded the state standard. new text end new text begin (c) The policy must provide the parent of a student automatically enrolled in a course an opportunity to opt the student out of the academic acceleration policy and enroll the student in an alternative course or program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Participation requirements. new text end new text begin A participant must: new text end new text begin (1) prioritize recruiting teachers of color with the training necessary to teach advanced placement courses or graduate credits necessary to teach secondary school courses for postsecondary credit, or providing teachers of color with opportunities to obtain the necessary training or graduate credits at no cost; new text end new text begin (2) notify a parent or guardian at least two weeks before the start of the school year that a student has been automatically enrolled in advanced coursework for that school term under the district policy. The notice must include information about the benefits of advanced coursework, the district's automatic enrollment policy, and the courses available to students leading to dual credit and advanced placement. The information must be available in the three most common languages in the district; new text end new text begin (3) identify tutoring and other academic supports available to students having difficulty in advanced coursework; and new text end new text begin (4) collect and report to the commissioner in the form and manner determined by the commissioner disaggregated data on the number of students who are eligible for automatic enrollment, who opt out or drop the course, who complete an advanced placement course but do not take the assessment, who take the advanced placement assessment but do not pass, and who pass an advanced placement assessment. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Application process. new text end new text begin (a) A district applying to participate in the pilot program must submit an application to the commissioner in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. The application must identify how state grant funds would be used to increase access to advanced coursework. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must notify participants of their selection by January 1, 2026. At least one participating district must have a high percentage of American Indian students. When selecting the remaining five participants, the commissioner must, to the extent practicable, ensure the rollout sites represent urban school districts, suburban school districts, nonurban school districts, and charter schools. The commissioner may also consider: new text end new text begin (1) the availability of advanced coursework to current students; new text end new text begin (2) the number of enrolled students currently participating in advanced coursework; and new text end new text begin (3) the number of enrolled students eligible for free and reduced-price meals. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Grant uses. new text end new text begin Participants must use grant funds to pay for advanced placement fees for all students automatically enrolled in an advanced placement course. A district may use grant funds for the following eligible expenses: new text end new text begin (1) training for teachers to teach advanced placement courses or secondary school courses for postsecondary credit; new text end new text begin (2) textbooks and other instructional materials; new text end new text begin (3) tutoring for students enrolled in advanced coursework; new text end new text begin (4) administrative expenses, including expenses related to data collection and reporting and family engagement; and new text end new text begin (5) notwithstanding any law to the contrary, bonuses for teachers based on the number of students who pass advanced placement exams. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin State report. new text end new text begin (a) By January 1, 2030, the commissioner of education must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education on the pilot program. new text end new text begin (b) The report must include the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the number of students who were eligible for advanced coursework under the pilot program, and of those students, the number of students who enrolled in advanced coursework and the number of students who did not enroll in advanced coursework; the number of students who completed advanced coursework; and the number of students who did not complete advanced coursework. The data must be disaggregated by race and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price meals, and special education status; new text end new text begin (2) the number of teachers providing instruction in advanced coursework, including the number of teachers recruited to teach advanced coursework. The data must be disaggregated by race and ethnicity; new text end new text begin (3) the advanced coursework students were automatically enrolled in; and new text end new text begin (4) feedback provided by participating districts on the implementation of the pilot program. new text end new text begin (c) The report must include recommendations to the legislature on the implementation of a statewide academic acceleration program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Academic acceleration pilot program. new text end new text begin (a) For the academic acceleration pilot program: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The department may retain up to 15 percent of the appropriation to create an application for the pilot program, administer the grant, and report to the legislature on the pilot program. new text end new text begin (c) This appropriation does not cancel but is available until June 30, 2029. new text end